California, session 20252026, AB2657.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11209 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11209. (a) No A person shall not deliver Schedule II, III, or IV controlled substances to a pharmacy or pharmacy receiving area, nor shall any person receive controlled substances on behalf of a pharmacy unless, at the time of delivery, a pharmacist or authorized receiving personnel signs a receipt showing the type and quantity of the controlled substances received. Any discrepancy between the receipt and the type or quantity of controlled substances actually received shall be reported to the delivering wholesaler or manufacturer by the next business day after delivery to the pharmacy.(b) The delivery receipt and any record of discrepancy shall be maintained by the wholesaler or manufacturer for a period of three years.(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.(d) Nothing in this section shall require a common carrier to label a package containing controlled substances in a manner contrary to federal law or regulation.